Maryland, session 2026, HB1613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
15–102.
This title applies only in Caroline County.
15–206.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1613*

HOUSE BILL 1613
(a) [The county codes administrator is the inspector for the Board.] THE
INSPECTOR FOR THE BOARD IS:
(1) THE COUNTY CODES ADMINISTRATOR; OR
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL THE BOARD APPOINTS AS INSPECTOR.
(b) The Board shall specify the duties of the inspector, including the
administration and enforcement of the alcoholic beverages laws of the county.
(c) The salary of the inspector shall be as provided in the county budget.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.